Missouri, session 2026, HB1634.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 266.160 and 266.180, RSMo, are repealed and two new sections
enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 266.160 and 266.180, to read as follows:
266.160. When used in sections 266.152 to 266.220 the following terms mean:
(1) "Brand name", any word, name, symbol, or device, or any combination thereof,
identifying the commercial feed of a distributor, manufacturer or guarantor and distinguishing
it from that of others;
(2) "Commercial feed", all materials or combinations of materials which are
distributed or intended for distribution for use as feed or for mixing in feed, unless such
materials are specifically exempted by the director. Unmixed whole seeds and physically
altered entire unmixed seeds, when such whole or physically altered seeds are not chemically
changed or are not adulterated within the meaning of subsection 1 of section 266.180, as well
as wild bird seed, are exempt from the definition of commercial feed. Commercial feed
shall include "industrial hemp" as defined in section 195.010 and as authorized under
subdivision (2) of section 266.180. The director by rule may exempt from this definition or
from specific provisions of sections 266.152 to 266.220, commodities such as hay, straw,
stover, silage, cobs, husks, hulls, and individual chemical compounds or substances when
such commodities, compounds or substances are not intermixed with other materials and are
not adulterated within the meaning of [subsection 1] subdivision (1) of section 266.180,
except for the inclusion of industrial hemp under subdivision (2) of such section.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1634 2
Commercial feed shall not include feed that is manufactured, distributed and consumed by the
manufacturer's own livestock;
(3) "Consultant-formulated feed", commercial feed manufactured for a final
purchaser based upon a formula and/or specifications developed for the feed purchaser by
an independent consultant or feed manufacturer;
(4) "Customer-formula feed", commercial feed which consists of a mixture of
commercial feeds or feed ingredients or both, each batch of which is manufactured according
to the specific instructions of the final purchaser;
(5) "Department", the Missouri department of agriculture;
(6) "Director", the director of the Missouri department of agriculture;
(7) "Distribute", to offer for sale, sell, exchange, or barter, commercial feed; or to
supply, furnish, or otherwise provide commercial feed;
(8) "Distributor", any person who distributes;
(9) "Drug", any article intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment,
or prevention of disease in animals other than man, and articles other than feed intended to
affect the structure or any function of the animal body;
(10) "Feed ingredient", each of the constituent materials making up a commercial
feed;
(11) "Independent consultant", any person who provides animal nutritional
formulation to a feed purchaser for a fee rather than the sale of feed except that a
veterinarian actively treating an identified animal is not an independent consultant;
(12) "Label", a display of written, printed or graphic matter upon or affixed to the
container in which a commercial feed is distributed, or on the invoice or delivery slip with
which a commercial feed is distributed;
(13) "Labeling", all labels and other written, printed or graphic matter:
(a) Upon a commercial feed or any of its containers or wrapper; or
(b) Accompanying such commercial feed;
(14) "Manufacture", to grind, mix or blend, or further process a commercial feed for
distribution;
(15) "Metric ton", a metric ton of one thousand kilograms or two thousand two
hundred and four pounds avoirdupois;
(16) "Mineral feed", a commercial feed intended to supply primarily mineral
elements or inorganic nutrients;
(17) "Official sample", a sample of feed taken by the director or the director's agent in
accordance with the provisions of subsection 3, 5, 6 or 9 of section 266.200;
(18) "Percent" or "percentages", percentages by weights;
(19) "Person" includes individual, partnership, corporation, and association;

HB 1634 3
(20) "Pet", any domesticated animal normally maintained in or near the household of
the owner thereof;
(21) "Pet food", any commercial feed prepared and distributed for consumption by
dogs and cats;
(22) "Product name", the name of the commercial feed which identifies it as to kind,
class, or specific use;
(23) "Quantity statement", the net weight (mass), net volume (liquid or dry), or count;
(24) "Rule", an administrative rule as defined by chapter 536 or further elaboration of
a particular statute;
(25) "Specialty pet", any domesticated animal pet normally maintained in a cage or
tank, such as but not limited to gerbils, hamsters, birds, fish, and turtles;
(26) "Specialty pet food", any commercial feed prepared and distributed for
consumption by specialty pets;
(27) "Ton", a net weight of two thousand pounds avoirdupois.
266.180. 1. A commercial feed shall be deemed to be adulterated:
(1) (a) If it bears or contains any poisonous or deleterious substance which may
render it injurious to health; but in case the substance is not an added substance, such
commercial feed shall not be considered adulterated under this subdivision if the quantity of
such substance in such commercial feed does not ordinarily render it injurious to health; or
(b) If it bears or contains any added poisonous, added deleterious, or added
nonnutritive substance which is unsafe within the meaning of Section 406 of the Federal
Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (other than one which is (i) a pesticide chemical in or on a raw
agricultural commodity; or (ii) a food additive); or
(c) If it is, or it bears or contains any food additive which is unsafe within the
meaning of Section 409 of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act; or
(d) If it is a raw agricultural commodity and it bears or contains a pesticide chemical
which is unsafe within the meaning of Section 408(a) of the Federal Food, Drug, and
Cosmetic Act; provided, where a pesticide chemical has been used in or on a raw agricultural
commodity in conformity with an exemption granted or a tolerance prescribed under Section
408 of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act and such raw agricultural commodity has
been subjected to processing such as canning, cooking, freezing, dehydrating, or milling, the
residue of such pesticide chemical remaining in or on such processed feed shall not be
deemed unsafe if such residue in or on the raw agricultural commodity has been removed to
the extent possible in good manufacturing practice and the concentration of such residue in
the processed feed is not greater than the tolerance prescribed for the raw agricultural
commodity unless the feeding of such processed feed will result or is likely to result in a

HB 1634 4
pesticide residue in the edible product of the animal, which is unsafe within the meaning of
Section 408(a), of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act;
(e) If it is, or it bears or contains any color additive which is unsafe within the
meaning of section 706 of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act;
(f) If it is, or it bears or contains any new animal drug which is unsafe within the
meaning of section 514 of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act;
(g) If it consists in whole or in part of any filthy, putrid, or decomposed substance, or
if it is otherwise unfit for feed;
(h) If it has been prepared, packed, or held under insanitary conditions whereby it
may have become contaminated with filth, or whereby it may have been rendered injurious to
health;
(i) If it is, in whole or in part, the product of a diseased animal or of an animal which
dies other than by slaughter which is unsafe within the meaning of section 402(a)(5) of the
Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act;
(j) If its container is composed, in whole or in part, of any poisonous or deleterious
substance which may render the contents injurious to health;
(k) If it has been intentionally subjected to radiation, unless the use of the radiation
was in conformity with the regulation or exemption in effect pursuant to section 409 of the
Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act;
(2) If any valuable constituent has been in whole or in part omitted or abstracted
therefrom or any less valuable substance substituted therefor;
(3) If its composition or quality falls below or differs from that which it is purported
or is represented to possess by its labeling;
(4) If it contains a drug and the methods used in or the facilities or controls used for
its manufacture, processing, or packaging do not conform to current good manufacturing
practice regulations promulgated by the director to assure that the drug meets the requirement
of sections 266.152 to 266.220 as to safety and has the identity and strength and meets the
quality and purity characteristics which it purports or is represented to possess. In
promulgating such rules, the director shall adopt the current good manufacturing practice
regulations for type A medicated articles and type B and type C medicated feeds established
under authority of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, unless the director determines
that they are not appropriate to the conditions which exist in this state;
(5) If it contains viable weed seeds in amounts exceeding the limits which the director
shall establish by rule.

HB 1634 5
2. Commercial feed shall not be deemed to be adulterated solely due to
containing seed from industrial hemp if such commercial feed is used as feed or for
mixing in feed for a pet, specialty pet, horse, or laying hens.
✔